North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-39.4 Streamlined Sales And Use Tax Agreement

57-39.4-01.
Adoption of streamlined sales and use tax agreement.

North Dakota adopts the streamlined sales and use tax agreement as adopted November 12, 2002, and as may be amended by the member states of the streamlined sales tax project. The entire agreement is adopted by reference with the exception of articles III and V, which are adopted as set out in this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2007, ch. 528, § 7; 2011, ch. 473, § 4.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 538, S.L. 2003, repealed former Chapter 57-39.4 Simplified Sales and Use Tax Administration, as it existed on July 31, 2003, and enacted new Chapter 57-39.4 Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Agreement, which became effective October 1, 2005.

57-39.4-02. (301)
State level administration.

Each member state shall provide state level administration of sales and use taxes subject to the agreement. The state level administration may be performed by a member state’s tax commission, department of revenue, or any other single entity designated by state law. Sellers and purchasers are only required to register with, file returns with, and remit funds to the state level authority. The state level authority of a member state shall provide for collection of any local taxes and distribution of them to the appropriate taxing jurisdictions. The state level authority shall conduct, or others may be authorized to conduct on its behalf, subject to the provisions of subsection 2, all audits of the sellers and purchasers for that state’s tax and the tax of its local jurisdictions. Except as provided in this chapter local jurisdictions shall not conduct independent sales or use tax audits of sellers and purchasers.

If authorized by statute, nothing in this section prohibits the state level authority from authorizing audits of taxpayers to be conducted or performed by others on behalf of the state level authority provided:

The person is conducting the audit for all taxes due and not only for taxes due to a specific local taxing jurisdiction;

The person is subject to the same confidentiality provisions and other protections afforded to a taxpayer as a person working for the state level authority;

Absent fraud, a refund claim filed subsequent to the audit that covers part of the audit period or mutual consent, the audit does not cover an audit period already conducted by the state level authority or another person acting on its behalf; and

The audit is subject to the same administrative and appeal procedures granted to audits conducted by the state level authority.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2011, ch. 473, § 5.

57-39.4-03. (302)
State and local tax bases.

The tax base for local jurisdictions shall be identical to the state tax base unless otherwise prohibited by federal law. This section does not apply to sales or use taxes levied on fuel used to power motor vehicles, aircraft, locomotives, or watercraft, or to electricity, piped natural or artificial gas, or other fuels delivered by the seller and the retail sale or transfer of motor vehicles, aircraft, watercraft, modular homes, manufactured homes, or mobile homes.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2011, ch. 473, § 6.

57-39.4-04. (303)
Seller registration.

Each member state shall participate in an online sales and use tax registration system in cooperation with the other member states. Under this system:

A seller registering under the agreement may register in one or more of the states utilizing the central registration system provided in article IV of the agreement.

A certified service provider may require a seller registering under the agreement to register in all of the full-member states as a condition of receiving certified service provider services.

The member states agree not to require the payment of any registration fees or other charges for a seller registering through the central registration system in a state in which the seller has no legal requirement to register.

A written signature from the seller is not required.

An agent may register a seller under uniform procedures adopted by the member states.

A seller may cancel its registration under the system at any time under uniform procedures adopted by the governing board. Cancellation does not relieve the seller of its liability for remitting to the proper states any taxes collected.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve a seller of any legal obligation it may have under a state’s laws to register in that state or its obligation to collect and remit taxes for at least thirty-six months in a state and meet all other requirements for amnesty set out in section 402 of the agreement in order to be eligible for amnesty in the state.

Whenever a state joins the agreement, sellers already registered under the agreement shall be notified by the governing board and the sellers may elect to also be registered in the new state.

The governing board shall make information available regarding the requirements and options for filing a simplified electronic return and for filing remittances in any member state. A member state may provide information to sellers concerning other tax return filing options in that state.

The governing board shall cause the system for registering under the agreement to include a feature that allows sellers registered under the agreement to update relevant registration data in the system and have such updated data provided to all affected states utilizing the system. The governing board shall establish conditions and procedures to allow states which are not members of the agreement to participate in the registration system.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2011, ch. 473, § 7; 2019, ch. 477, § 9, effective July 1, 2019.

57-39.4-05. (304)
Notice for state tax changes.

Each member state shall lessen the difficulties faced by sellers when there is a change in a state sales or use tax rate or base by making a reasonable effort to do all of the following:

Provide sellers with as much advance notice as practicable of a rate change.

Limit the effective date of a rate change to the first day of a calendar quarter.

Notify sellers of legislative changes in the tax base and amendments to sales and use tax rules and regulations.

Failure of a seller to receive notice or failure of a member state to provide notice or limit the effective date of a rate change shall not relieve the seller of its obligation to collect sales or use taxes for that member state.

Each member state failing to provide for at least thirty days between the enactment of the statute providing for a rate change and the effective date of such rate change shall relieve the seller of liability for failing to collect tax at the new effective rate if:

The seller collected tax at the immediately preceding effective rate; and

The seller’s failure to collect at the newly effective rate does not extend beyond thirty days after the date of enactment of the new rate.

Notwithstanding subsection 3, if the member state establishes that the seller fraudulently failed to collect at the new rate or solicits purchasers based on the immediately preceding effective rate, this relief does not apply.

Member states may provide for relief of liability for failing to collect tax as a result of a tax change beyond the liability relief required by subsection 3.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2009, ch. 556, § 6.

57-39.4-06. (305)
Local rate and boundary changes.

Each member state that has local jurisdictions that levy a sales or use tax shall:

Provide that local rate changes will be effective only on the first day of a calendar quarter after a minimum of sixty days’ notice to sellers.

Apply local sales tax rate changes to purchases from printed catalogs wherein the purchaser computed the tax based upon local tax rates published in the catalog only on the first day of a calendar quarter after a minimum of one hundred twenty days’ notice to sellers.

For sales and use tax purposes only, apply local jurisdiction boundary changes only on the first day of a calendar quarter after a minimum of sixty days’ notice to sellers.

Provide and maintain a database that describes boundary changes for all taxing jurisdictions. This database shall include a description of the change and the effective date of the change for sales and use tax purposes.

Provide and maintain a database of all sales and use tax rates for all of the jurisdictions levying taxes within the state. For the identification of states, counties, cities, and parishes, codes corresponding to the rates must be provided according to federal information processing standards as developed by the national institute of standards and technology. For the identification of all other jurisdictions, codes corresponding to the rates must be in the format determined by the governing board.

Provide and maintain a database that assigns the proper tax rates and jurisdictions to each five-digit and nine-digit zip code within a member state. The state must apply the lowest combined tax rate imposed in the zip code area if the area includes more than one tax rate in any level of taxing jurisdictions. If a nine-digit zip code designation is not available for a street address or if a seller or certified service provider is unable to determine the nine-digit zip code designation applicable to a transaction after exercising due diligence to determine the designation, the seller or certified service provider may apply the rate for the five-digit zip code area. For the purposes of this section, there is a rebuttable presumption that a seller or certified service provider has exercised due diligence if the seller has attempted to determine the tax rate and jurisdiction by using software approved by the governing board that makes this assignment from the address and zip code information applicable to the transaction.

Have the option of providing address-based boundary database records for assigning taxing jurisdictions and their associated rates which shall be in addition to the requirements of subsection 6. The database records must be in the same approved format as the database records under subsection 6 and must meet the requirements developed pursuant to the federal Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act [4 U.S.C. 119(a)]. The governing board may allow a member state to require sellers that register under this agreement to use an address-based database provided by that member state. If any member state develops address-based assignment database records pursuant to the agreement, a seller or certified service provider may use those database records in place of the five-digit and nine-digit zip code database records provided for in subsection 6. If a seller or certified service provider is unable to determine the applicable rate and jurisdiction using an address-based database record after exercising due diligence, the seller or certified service provider may apply the nine-digit zip code designation applicable to a transaction. If a nine-digit zip code designation is not available for a street address or if a seller or certified service provider is unable to determine the nine-digit zip code designation applicable to a transaction after exercising due diligence to determine the designation, the seller or certified service provider may apply the rate for the five-digit zip code area. For the purposes of this section, there is a rebuttable presumption that a seller or certified service provider has exercised due diligence if the seller or certified service provider has attempted to determine the tax rate and jurisdiction by using software approved by the governing board that makes this assignment from the address and zip code information applicable to the transaction.

States which have met the requirements of subsection 6 may also elect to certify vendor-provided address-based databases for assigning tax rates and jurisdictions. The databases must be in the same approved format as the database records under subsection 7 and must meet the requirements developed under the federal Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act [4 U.S.C. 119(a)]. If a state certifies a vendor-provided address-based database, a seller or certified service provider may use that database in place of the database provided for in subsection 6 or 7. Vendors providing address-based databases may request certification of their databases from the governing board. Certification by the governing board does not replace the requirement that the databases be certified by the states individually.

Make databases provided under subsections 5, 6, 7, and 8 available to a seller, or certified service provider by the first day of the month prior to the first day of a calendar quarter. Databases must be in a format approved by the governing board and available on each state’s website or other location determined by the governing board.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2007, ch. 528, § 8; 2009, ch. 556, § 7; 2019, ch. 477, § 10, effective July 1, 2019.

57-39.4-07. (306)
Relief from certain liability.

Each member state shall relieve sellers and certified service providers using databases under subsections 6, 7, and 8 of section 57-39.4-06 from liability to the member state and local jurisdictions for having charged and collected the incorrect amount of sales or use tax resulting from the seller or certified service provider relying on erroneous data provided by a member state on tax rates, boundaries, or taxing jurisdiction assignments. After providing adequate notice as determined by the governing board, a member state that provides an address-based database for assigning taxing jurisdictions under subsection 7 or 8 of section 57-39.4-06 may cease providing liability relief for errors resulting from the reliance on the database provided by the member state under subsection 6 of section 57-39.4-06. If a seller demonstrates that requiring the use of the address-based database would create an undue hardship, a member state and the governing board may extend the relief from liability to such seller for a designated period of time.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2007, ch. 528, § 9.

57-39.4-08. (307)
Database requirements and exceptions.

The electronic databases provided for in subsections 4, 5, 6, and 7 of section 57-39.4-06 shall be in a downloadable format approved by the governing board. The databases may be directly provided by the state or provided by a vendor as designated by the state. A database provided by a vendor as designated by a state shall be applicable to and subject to all provisions of sections 57-39.4-06 and 57-39.4-07 and this section. These databases must be provided at no cost to the user of the database.

The provisions of subsections 6 and 7 of section 57-39.4-06 do not apply when the purchased product is received by the purchaser at the business location of the seller.

The databases provided by subsections 4, 5, 6, and 7 of section 57-39.4-06 are not a requirement of a state prior to entering into the agreement. A seller that did not have a requirement to register in a state prior to registering under this agreement or a certified service provider shall not be required to collect sales or use taxes for the state until the first day of the calendar quarter commencing more than sixty days after the state has provided the databases required by subsections 4, 5, and 6 of section 57-39.4-06. Provided, for the initial implementation of the agreement, a certified service provider shall be required to collect sales and use taxes for each member state, subject to the provisions of the agreement, under the terms of the operating agreement entered into between the certified service provider and the governing board in order to provide adequate time for testing and loading of the databases.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2007, ch. 528, § 10.

57-39.4-09. (308)
State and local tax rates.

No member state shall have multiple state sales and use tax rates on items of personal property or services, except that a member state may impose a single additional rate, which may be zero, on food and food ingredients and drugs as defined by state law under the agreement. In addition, if federal law prohibits the imposition of local tax on a product that is subject to state tax, the state may impose an additional rate on the product, provided the rate achieves tax parity for similar products.

A member state that has local jurisdictions that levy a sales or use tax shall not have more than one local sales tax rate or more than one local use tax rate per local jurisdiction. If the local jurisdiction levies both a sales tax and use tax, the local rates must be identical.

The provisions of this section do not apply to sales or use taxes levied on fuel used to power motor vehicles, aircraft, locomotives, or watercraft, or to electricity, piped natural or artificial gas or other fuels delivered by the seller, or the retail sale or transfer of motor vehicles, aircraft, watercraft, modular homes, manufactured homes, or mobile homes.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2007, ch. 528, § 11; 2011, ch. 473, § 8.

57-39.4-10. (309)
Application of general sourcing rules and exclusions from the rules.

Each member state shall agree to require sellers to source the retail sale of a product in accordance with section 57-39.4-11 or 57-39.4-11.1. Except as provided in section 57-39.4-11.1, the provisions of section 57-39.4-11 apply to all sales regardless of the characterization of a product as tangible personal property, a digital good, or a service. Except as otherwise provided in the agreement, the provisions of sections 57-39.4-11 and 57-39.4-11.1 only apply to determine a seller’s obligation to pay or collect and remit a sales or use tax with respect to the seller’s retail sale of a product. These provisions do not affect the obligation of a purchaser or lessee to remit tax on the use of the product to the taxing jurisdictions of that use.

Sections 57-39.4-11 and 57-39.4-11.1 do not apply to sales or use taxes levied on the following:

The retail sale or transfer of watercraft, modular homes, manufactured homes, or mobile homes. These items must be sourced according to the requirements of each member state.

The retail sale, excluding lease or rental, of motor vehicles, trailers, semitrailers, or aircraft that do not qualify as transportation equipment, as defined in subsection 4 of section 57-39.4-11. The retail sale of these items shall be sourced according to the requirements of each member state, and the lease or rental of these items must be sourced according to subsection 3 of section 57-39.4-11.

Telecommunications services and ancillary services, as set out in section 57-39.4-16, and internet access service shall be sourced in accordance with section 57-39.4-15.

Florist sales as defined by each member state. These sales must be sourced according to the requirements of each member state.

The retail sale of products and services qualifying as direct mail must be sourced in accordance with section 57-39.4-14.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2007, ch. 14, § 26; 2007, ch. 528, § 12; 2009, ch. 556, § 8; 2011, ch. 473, § 9.

57-39.4-11. (310)
General sourcing rules.

Except as provided in section 57-39.4-11.1, a retail sale, excluding lease or rental, of a product shall be sourced as follows:

When the product is received by the purchaser at a business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to that business location.

When the product is not received by the purchaser at a business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to the location where receipt by the purchaser, or the purchaser’s donee, designated as such by the purchaser, occurs, including the location indicated by instructions for delivery to the purchaser or donee, known to the seller.

When subdivisions a and b do not apply, the sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the purchaser that is available from the business records of the seller that are maintained in the ordinary course of the seller’s business when use of this address does not constitute bad faith.

When subdivisions a, b, and c do not apply, the sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the purchaser obtained during the consummation of the sale, including the address of a purchaser’s payment instrument, if no other address is available, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith.

When none of the previous rules of subdivisions a, b, c, and d apply, including the circumstance in which the seller is without sufficient information to apply the previous rules, then the location will be determined by the address from which tangible personal property was shipped, from which the digital good or the computer software delivered electronically was first available for transmission by the seller, or from which the service was provided, disregarding for these purposes any location that merely provided the digital transfer of the product sold.

The lease or rental of tangible personal property, other than property identified in subsection 3 or 4, shall be sourced as follows:

For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic payments, the first periodic payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in accordance with the provisions of subsection 1. Periodic payments made subsequent to the first payment are sourced to the primary property location for each period covered by the payment. The primary property location shall be as indicated by an address for the property provided by the lessee that is available to the lessor from its records maintained in the ordinary course of business, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith. The property location shall not be altered by intermittent use at different locations, such as use of business property that accompanies employees on business trips and service calls.

For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic payments, the payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in accordance with the provisions of subsection 1.

This subsection does not affect the imposition or computation of sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump sum or accelerated basis, or on the acquisition of property for lease.

The lease or rental of motor vehicles, trailers, semitrailers, or aircraft that do not qualify as transportation equipment, as defined in subsection 4, shall be sourced as follows:

For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic payments, each periodic payment is sourced to the primary property location. The primary property location shall be as indicated by an address for the property provided by the lessee that is available to the lessor from its records maintained in the ordinary course of business, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith. This location shall not be altered by intermittent use at different locations.

For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic payments, the payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in accordance with the provisions of subsection 1.

This subsection does not affect the imposition or computation of sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump sum or accelerated basis or on the acquisition of property for lease.

The retail sale, including lease or rental, of transportation equipment shall be sourced the same as a retail sale in accordance with the provisions of subsection 1, notwithstanding the exclusion of lease or rental in subsection 1. “Transportation equipment” means any of the following:

Locomotives and railcars that are utilized for the carriage of persons or property in interstate commerce.

Trucks and truck-tractors with a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,001 pounds [4535.92 kilograms] or greater, trailers, semitrailers, or passenger buses that are:

Registered through the international registration plan; and

Operated under authority of a carrier authorized and certificated by the United States department of transportation or another federal authority to engage in the carriage of persons or property in interstate commerce.

Aircraft that are operated by air carriers authorized and certificated by the United States department of transportation or another federal or a foreign authority to engage in the carriage of persons or property in interstate or foreign commerce.

Containers designed for use on and component parts attached or secured on the items set forth in subdivisions a, b, and c.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2009, ch. 556, § 9.

57-39.4-11.1. (310.1)
Election for origin-based sourcing.

A member state that has local jurisdictions that levy or receive sales or use taxes may elect to source the retail sale of tangible personal property and digital goods under the provisions of this section in lieu of the provisions of subdivisions b, c, and d of subsection 1 of section 57-39.4-11 if the state complies with subsection 3 of this section and the only exception to section 57-39.4-11 is in subsection 2 of this section.

A member state may source retail sales, excluding lease or rental, of tangible personal property or digital goods to the location where the order is received by the seller if:

The order is received in the same state by the seller where receipt of the product by the purchaser or the purchaser’s designated donee occurs;

The location where receipt of the product by the purchaser occurs is determined under subdivisions b, c, and d of subsection 1 of section 57-39.4-11; and

At the time the order is received, the recordkeeping system of the seller used to calculate the proper amount of sales or use tax to be imposed captures the location where the order is received.

A member state electing to source sales under this section shall comply with all of the following:

When the location where the order is received by the seller and the location where the receipt of the product by the purchaser or the purchaser’s designated donee occurs as determined under subdivisions b, c, and d of subsection 1 of section 57-39.4-11 are in different states, the sale must be sourced under the provisions of section 57-39.4-11.

When the sale is sourced under this section to the location where the order is received by the seller, only the sales tax for the location where the order is received by the seller may be levied. No additional sales or use tax based on the location where the product is delivered to the purchaser may be levied on that sale. The purchaser shall not be entitled to any refund if the combined state and local rate at the location where the product is received by the purchaser is lower than the rate where the order is received by the seller.

A member state may not require a seller to use a recordkeeping system that captures the location where the order is received to calculate the proper amount of sales or use tax to be imposed.

A purchaser shall not have an additional liability to the state for tax, penalty, or interest on a sale for which the purchaser remits tax to the seller in the amount invoiced by the seller if the invoice amount is calculated at either the rate applicable to the location where receipt by the purchaser occurs or at the rate applicable to the location where the order is received by the seller. A purchaser may rely on a written representation by the seller as to the location where the order for the sale was received by the seller. When the purchaser does not have a written representation by the seller as to the location where the order for the sale was received by the seller, the purchaser may use the seller’s business address that is available from the purchaser’s business records maintained in the ordinary course of the purchaser’s business to determine the rate applicable to the location where the order was received.

The location where the order is received by or on behalf of the seller means the physical location of a seller or third party such as an established outlet, office location, or automated order receipt system operated by or on behalf of the seller, where an order is initially received by or on behalf of the seller and not where the order may be subsequently accepted, completed, or fulfilled. An order is received when all of the information from the purchaser necessary to determine whether the order can be accepted has been received by or on behalf of the seller. The location from which a product is shipped must not be used in determining the location where the order is received by the seller.

A member state must provide for direct pay permits under section 57-39.4-27 and the requirements of this subsection. Purchasers that remit sales and use tax under a direct pay permit shall remit tax at the rate in effect for the location where receipt of the product by the purchaser occurs or the product is first used as determined by state law. A member state may establish reasonable thresholds at which the member state will consider direct pay applications, provided the threshold must be based upon purchases with no distinction between taxable and nontaxable purchases. The member state shall establish a process for application for a direct pay permit as provided in this chapter. The member state may require the direct pay permit applicant to demonstrate:

An ability to comply with the sales and use tax laws of the state;

A business purpose for seeking a direct pay permit and how the permit will benefit tax compliance; and

Proof of good standing under the tax laws of the state. The member state shall review all permit applications in a timely manner. Notification of authorization or denial must be received by applicants within one hundred twenty days of application. The member state may not limit direct pay permit applicants to businesses engaged in manufacturing or businesses that do not know the ultimate use of the product at the time of the purchase.

When taxable services are sold with tangible personal property or digital products under a single contract or in the same transaction, are billed on the same billing statement, and because of the application of this section, would be sourced to different jurisdictions, a member state shall elect either origin sourcing or destination sourcing to determine a single situs for that transaction. The member state election is required until the governing board adopts a uniform methodology to address these sales.

A member state that elects to source the sale of tangible personal property and digital goods under the provisions of this section shall inform the governing board of the election.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 556, § 10; 2011, ch. 473, § 10; 2013, ch. 465, § 2.

57-39.4-12. (311)
General sourcing definitions.

For the purposes of subsection 1 of section 57-39.4-11, the terms “receive” and “receipt” mean:

Taking possession of tangible personal property;

Making first use of services; or

Taking possession or making first use of digital goods, whichever comes first. The terms “receive” and “receipt” do not include possession by a shipping company on behalf of the purchaser.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1.

57-39.4-13. (312)
Multiple points of use. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 528, § 24.

57-39.4-14. (313)
Direct mail sourcing.

For purposes of this section:

“Advertising and promotional direct mail” means:

Printed material that meets the definition of direct mail, in appendix C, part I of the agreement; and

The primary purpose of which is to attract public attention to a product, person, business, or organization, or to attempt to sell, popularize, or secure financial support for a product, person, business, or organization. As used in this subsection, the word “product” means tangible personal property, a product transferred electronically, or a service.

“Other direct mail” means any direct mail that is not advertising and promotional direct mail regardless of whether advertising and promotional direct mail is included in the same mailing. The term includes:

Transactional direct mail that contains personal information specific to the addressee, including invoices, bills, statements of account, and payroll advices;

Any legally required mailings, including privacy notices, tax reports, and stockholder reports; and

Other nonpromotional direct mail delivered to existing or former shareholders, customers, employees, or agents, including newsletters and informational pieces.

Notwithstanding sections 57-39.4-11 and 57-39.4-11.1, the following provisions apply to sales of advertising and promotional direct mail:

A purchaser of advertising and promotional direct mail may provide the seller with either:

A direct pay permit;

A streamlined sales and use tax agreement certificate of exemption claiming direct mail or other written statement approved, authorized, or accepted by the state; or

Information showing the jurisdictions to which the advertising and promotional direct mail is to be delivered to recipients.

If the purchaser provides the permit, certificate, or statement referred to in this subsection, the seller, in the absence of bad faith, is relieved of all obligations to collect, pay, or remit any tax on any transaction involving advertising and promotional direct mail to which the permit, certificate, or statement applies. The purchaser shall source the sale to the jurisdictions to which the advertising and promotional direct mail is to be delivered to the recipients and shall report and pay any applicable tax due.

If the purchaser provides the seller information showing the jurisdictions to which the advertising and promotional direct mail is to be delivered to recipients, the seller shall source the sale to the jurisdictions to which the advertising and promotional direct mail is to be delivered and shall collect and remit the applicable tax. In the absence of bad faith, the seller is relieved of any further obligation to collect any additional tax on the sale of advertising and promotional direct mail where the seller has sourced the sale according to the delivery information provided by the purchaser.

If the purchaser does not provide the seller with any of the items listed in this subsection, the sale shall be sourced according to subdivision e of subsection 1 of section 57-39.4-11. The state to which the advertising and promotional direct mail is delivered may disallow credit for tax paid on sales sourced under this subdivision.

Notwithstanding sections 57-39.4-11 and 57-39.4-11.1, the following provisions apply to sales of other direct mail:

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, sales of other direct mail are sourced in accordance with subdivision c of subsection 1 of section 57-39.4-11.

A purchaser of other direct mail may provide the seller with either:

A direct pay permit; or

A streamlined sales and use tax agreement certificate of exemption claiming direct mail or other written statement approved, authorized, or accepted by the state.

If the purchaser provides the permit, certificate, or statement referred to in this subsection, the seller, in the absence of bad faith, is relieved of all obligations to collect, pay, or remit any tax on any transaction involving other direct mail to which the permit, certificate, or statement applies. Notwithstanding subdivision a, the sale shall be sourced to the jurisdictions to which the other direct mail is to be delivered to the recipients and the purchaser shall report and pay any applicable tax due.

This section applies to a transaction characterized under state law as the sale of services only if the service is an integral part of the production and distribution of printed material that meets the definition of direct mail.

This section does not apply to any transaction that includes the development of billing information or the provision of any data processing service that is more than incidental regardless of whether advertising and promotional direct mail is included in the same mailing.

If a transaction is a “bundled transaction” that includes advertising and promotional direct mail, this section shall apply only if the primary purpose of the transaction is the sale of products or services that meet the definition of advertising and promotional direct mail.

Nothing in this section shall limit any purchaser’s:

Obligation for sales or use tax to any state to which the direct mail is delivered;

Right under local, state, federal, or constitutional law, to a credit for sales or use taxes legally due and paid to other jurisdictions; or

Right to a refund of sales or use taxes overpaid to any jurisdiction.

This section applies for purposes of uniformly sourcing direct mail transactions and does not impose requirements on states regarding the taxation of products that meet the definition of direct mail or to the application of sales for resale or other exemptions.

Other direct mail does not include the development of billing information or the provision of any data processing service that is more than incidental.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2011, ch. 473, § 11.

57-39.4-14.1. (313.1)
Election for origin-based direct mail sourcing.

Notwithstanding sections 57-39.4-11, 57-39.4-11.1, and 57-39.4-14, a member state may elect to source the sale of all direct mail delivered or distributed from a location within the state and delivered or distributed to a location within the state under this section.

If the purchaser provides the seller with a direct pay permit or a streamlined sales and use tax agreement certificate of exemption claiming direct mail or other written statement approved, authorized, or accepted by the state, the seller, in the absence of bad faith, is relieved of all obligations to collect, pay, or remit the applicable tax on any transaction involving direct mail. The purchaser must report and pay any applicable tax due. A streamlined sales and use tax agreement certificate of exemption claiming direct mail shall remain in effect for all future sales of direct mail by the seller to the purchaser until it is revoked in writing.

Except as provided in subsections 2, 3, and 4, the seller shall collect the tax according to subdivision e of subsection 1 of section 57-39.4-11. To the extent the seller knows that a portion of the sale of direct mail will be delivered or distributed to a location in another state, the seller shall collect the tax on that portion according to section 57-39.4-14.

Notwithstanding subsection 3, a seller may elect to use the provisions of section 57-39.4-14 to source all sales of advertising and promotional direct mail.

Nothing in this section limits a purchaser’s obligation for sales or use tax to any state to which the direct mail is delivered, except that a purchaser whose direct mail is sourced under subsection 3 shall owe no additional sales or use tax to that state based on where the purchaser uses or delivers the direct mail in the state.

A member state that elects to source the sale of direct mail under the provisions of this section shall inform the governing board in writing at least sixty days prior to the beginning of the calendar quarter this election begins.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 556, § 11; 2011, ch. 473, § 12.